Vermont, session 2025-2026, S194.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 911 is amended to read:
§ 911. PAYMENT RATES FOR PROVIDERS OF COMMUNITY-BASED
SERVICES
(a) The Secretary of Human Services shall calculate payment rates for
providers of community-based services that are reasonable and adequate to
achieve the required outcomes for the populations they serve. When
calculating these payment rates, the Secretary:
VT LEG #386019 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.194
2026 Page 2 of 4
(1) for informational purposes, shall ensure that the calculations take
into account factors that include:
(A) the reasonable cost of any governmental mandate that has been
enacted, adopted, or imposed by any State or federal authority; and
(B) a cost adjustment factor to reflect changes in reasonable costs of
goods to and services of providers of community-based services, including
those attributed to inflation and labor market dynamics; and
(2) may consider geographic differences in wages, benefits, housing,
and real estate costs in each region of the State.
(b) The Secretary shall establish a methodology for calculating payment
rates for providers of community-based services in accordance with this
section. The methodology shall:
(1) provide a schedule for conducting studies of the Medicaid
reimbursement rates paid to the providers of community-based services,
including the rates’ adequacy and their underlying methodologies, that
includes studying the rates paid to providers for each type of service at least
once every five years require a monthly prospective payment issued to each
community-based service provider on the first day of the month on which a
service is to be provided, reflecting:
(A) per-member per-month amounts calculated from the most
recently approved independent budgets; and
VT LEG #386019 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.194
2026 Page 3 of 4
(B) the number of individuals with approved individual budgets;
(2) set forth a predictable timeline for redetermination of base rates;
(3) include a process for calculating an annual inflationary rate
adjustment;
(4)(3) to the extent permitted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services, take into account the financial needs of providers whose
reimbursements may be negatively affected by client absences; and
(5)(4) use Vermont labor market rates and Vermont costs of operation.
(c) The Secretary shall establish a process by which a provider of
community-based services whose financial condition places it at imminent risk
of closure may request provider stabilization from the Agency.
(d) The Secretary shall recalculate the payment rates for providers of
community-based services in accordance with this section at least annually and
shall report those rates, and the amounts necessary to fund them, to the House
Committees on Appropriations, on Human Services, and on Health Care and
the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare annually
as part of the Agency’s budget presentation.
(e) Community-based service providers shall submit monthly encounter
data and invoices to the Agency, which shall inform subsequent monthly
payments. The Agency shall conduct a reconciliation process at least annually
to ensure alignment between authorized services and actual delivery of
VT LEG #386019 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.194
2026 Page 4 of 4
services. The reconciliation process shall include census validation, funding
accuracy, and value-based performance metrics.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386019 v.1